Nebraska, session 109, LB912A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $187,151 from the General
Fund and $40,000 from the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $338,010 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 178, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 912, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $115,740 for FY2026-27 or
$162,035 for FY2027-28.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-